Virginia statutes. Title 9.1. Commonwealth Public Safety.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 9.1-100.
Department of Criminal Justice Services.

There is created a Department of Criminal Justice Services (the “Department”) that shall be headed by a Director appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly. The Director shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The Director of the Department shall, under the direction and control of the Governor, exercise the powers and perform the duties conferred or imposed upon him by law and perform such other duties required by the Governor or the Criminal Justice Services Board.

History.

1981, c. 632, §§ 9-174, 9-175, 9-176; 1984, c. 720; 2001, c. 844.

Editor’s note.

In accordance with § 9-77.10 (now § 30-149), the Virginia Code Commission, in 1998, undertook a three-year recodification of

Titles 2.1

and 9. Title 2.1 had last been recodified in 1965 and Title 9 had never been recodified. The Commission’s draft of this revision, which was published as House Document 51 of the 2001 Session, was sent to the Governor and General Assembly in January, 2001. The revision, as amended by the General Assembly, became Acts 2001, c. 844, effective October 1, 2001.

Title 2.1 was rewritten primarily as new Title 2.2, with certain material now incorporated into

Titles 6.1

, 9.1, 17.1, 30, 37.1 and 51.1, and Title 9 was rewritten primarily as new Title 9.1, with certain material now incorporated into

Titles 3.1

, 2.2, and 30.
In addition, the Virginia Public Procurement Act, §§

11-35

to 11-80, was rewritten as §

2.2-4300

et seq., and §§

53.1-180

to 53.1-185.3, the Comprehensive Community Corrections Act for Local-Responsible Offenders, was rewritten as §§

9.1-173

to

9.1-183

.

Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections.

The case notes appearing under new
sections were decided under corresponding former sections or under prior law.

For a table of corresponding former and new sections, see the Table of Comparable Sections following the Table of Contents in Volume 10.

Acts 2001, c. 844, cl. 2, provides: “That whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions or contents of any section or chapter of Title 2.1 or Title 9 or any other title of the Code of Virginia as such titles existed prior to October 1, 2001, are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section or chapter of Title 2.2 or Title 9.1 or any other title of the Code and whenever any such former section or chapter is given a new number in Title 2.2 or Title 9.1 or any other title, all references to any such former section or chapter of Title 2.1 or Title 9 or other title appearing in this Code shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions, contents or portions thereof.”

Acts 2001, c. 844, cl. 3, provides: “That the regulations of any department or agency affected by the revision of Title 2.1, Title 9 or such other titles in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations adopted under this act.”

Acts 2001, c. 844, cl. 4, provides: “That this title revision of Title 2.1 as Title 2.2 and Title 9 as Title 9.1 and the repeal of Chapter 7 (§

11-35

et seq.) of Title 11 shall not be construed to require the reappointment of any officer or any member of a board, council, committee or other appointed body referred to in Title 2.2 or Title 9.1 and each such officer and member shall continue to serve for the term for which appointed pursuant to the provisions of Title 2.1, Title 9, or Chapter 7 (§

11-35

et seq.) of Title 11. The revision of Title 2.1 as Title 2.2 and Title 9 as Title 9.1 in this act shall not affect the classification or assignment of any state agency, institution, board, commission, council or other collegial body within the executive branch currently in effect pursuant to Title 2.1 or Title 9; such classifications and assignments within the executive branch which existed prior to the effective date of this act shall continue unless reclassified or reassigned by a later enactment of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor.”

Acts 2001, c. 844, cl. 5, provides: “That this title revision of Title 2.1 as Title 2.2 or Title 9 as Title 9.1 shall not be construed to affect the term of office of any elected officeholder holding office on October 1, 2001.”

Acts 2001, c. 844, cl. 6, provides: “That the provisions of § 30-152, formerly § 9-77.11, of the Code of Virginia shall apply to the codification of Title 2.2 and Title 9.1 so as to give effect to other laws enacted by the 2001 Session of the General Assembly notwithstanding the delay in the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2001, c. 844, cl. 7, provides: “That the repeal of Title 2.1, Title 9, and Chapter 7 (§

11-35

et seq.) of Title 11 effective as of October 1, 2001, shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, or any penalty incurred, or any right established, accrued or accruing on or before such date, or any proceeding, prosecution, suit or action pending on that day. Except as otherwise provided in this act, neither the repeal of Title 2.1, Title 9 or Chapter 7 (§

11-35

et seq.) of Title 11 nor the enactment of Title 2.2 or the enactment of Title 9.1, shall apply to offenses committed prior to October 1, 2001, and prosecution for such offenses shall be governed by the prior law, which is continued in effect for that purpose. For the purpose of this enactment, an offense was committed prior to October 1, 2001, if any of essential elements of the offense occurred prior thereto.”

Acts 2001, c. 844, cl. 8, provides: “That any notice given, recognizance taken, or process or writ issued before October 1, 2001, shall be valid although given, taken or to be returned to a day after such date, in like manner as if Title 2.2 and Title 9.1 had been effective before the same was given, taken or issued.”

Acts 2001, c. 844, cl. 14, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2001.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Appointment of special conservator of the peace. —

Virginia law requires a temporary registration issued by Department of Criminal Justice Services prior to a circuit court order appointing a qualified individual as a special conservator of the peace and also a valid registration after the circuit court enters an order of appointment.
See opinion of Attorney General to Ms. Shannon Dion, Director, Virginia Department of Criminal Justice Services, 18-042,
(8/28/2018).

Department of Criminal Justice Services cannot issue a temporary registration letter or valid registration document to a special conservator of the peace applicant seeking to possess firearms on school property because special conservators of the peace are not legally authorized to carry firearms on school property.
See opinion of Attorney General to Ms. Shannon Dion, Director, Virginia Department of Criminal Justice Services, 18-042,
(8/28/2018).

§ 9.1-101.
(For contingent expiration date, see Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 524 and 542) Definitions.

As used in this chapter or in Chapter 23 (§

19.2-387

et seq.) of Title 19.2, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Administration of criminal justice”
means performance of any activity directly involving the detection, apprehension, detention, pretrial release, post-trial release, prosecution, adjudication, correctional supervision, or rehabilitation of accused persons or criminal offenders or the collection, storage, and dissemination of criminal history record information.

“Board”
means the Criminal Justice Services Board.

“Conviction data”
means information in the custody of any criminal justice agency relating to a judgment of conviction, and the consequences arising therefrom, in any court.

“Correctional status information”
means records and data concerning each condition of a convicted person’s custodial status, including probation, confinement, work release, study release, escape, or termination of custody through expiration of sentence, parole, pardon, or court decision.

“Criminal history record information”
means records and data collected by criminal justice agencies on adult individuals consisting of identifiable descriptions and notations of arrests, detentions, indictments, informations, or other formal charges, and any disposition arising therefrom. The term shall not include juvenile record information which is controlled by Chapter 11 (§ 16.1-226 et seq.) of Title 16.1, criminal justice intelligence information, criminal justice investigative information, or correctional status information.

“Criminal justice agency”
means (i) a court or any other governmental agency or subunit thereof which as its principal function performs the administration of criminal justice and any other agency or subunit thereof which performs criminal justice activities, but only to the extent that it does so; (ii) for the purposes of Chapter 23 (§

19.2-387

et seq.) of Title 19.2, any private corporation or agency which, within the context of its criminal justice activities, employs special conservators of the peace appointed under Chapter 2 (§

19.2-12

et seq.) of Title 19.2, provided that (a) such private corporation or agency requires its officers or special conservators to meet compulsory training standards established by the Criminal Justice Services Board and submits reports of compliance with the training standards and (b) the private corporation or agency complies with the provisions of Article 3 (§

9.1-126

et seq.), but only to the extent that the private corporation or agency so designated as a criminal justice agency performs criminal justice activities; and (iii) the Office of the Attorney General, for all criminal justice activities otherwise permitted under clause (i) and for the purpose of performing duties required by the Civil Commitment of Sexually Violent Predators Act (§

37.2-900

et seq.).

“Criminal justice agency” includes any program certified by the Commission on VASAP pursuant to §

18.2-271.2

.

“Criminal justice agency” includes the Department of Criminal Justice Services.

“Criminal justice agency” includes the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission.

“Criminal justice agency” includes the Virginia State Crime Commission.

“Criminal justice information system”
means a system including the equipment, facilities, procedures, agreements, and organizations thereof, for the collection, processing, preservation, or dissemination of criminal history record information. The operations of the system may be performed manually or by using electronic computers or other automated data processing equipment.

“Department”
means the Department of Criminal Justice Services.

“Dissemination”
means any transfer of information, whether orally, in writing, or by electronic means. The term shall not include access to the information by officers or employees of a criminal justice agency maintaining the information who have both a need and right to know the information.

“Law-enforcement officer”
means any full-time or part-time employee of a police department or sheriff’s office which is a part of or administered by the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof, or any full-time or part-time employee of a private police department, and who is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime and the enforcement of the penal, traffic or highway laws of the Commonwealth, and shall include any (i) special agent of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority; (ii) police agent appointed under the provisions of § 56-353; (iii) officer of the Virginia Marine Police; (iv) conservation police officer who is a full-time sworn member of the enforcement division of the Department of Wildlife Resources; (v) investigator who is a sworn member of the security division of the Virginia Lottery; (vi) conservation officer of the Department of Conservation and Recreation commissioned pursuant to § 10.1-115; (vii) full-time sworn member of the enforcement division of the Department of Motor Vehicles appointed pursuant to §

46.2-217

; (viii) animal protection police officer employed under §

15.2-632

or

15.2-836.1

; (ix) campus police officer appointed under Article 3 (§

23.1-809

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 23.1; (x) member of the investigations unit designated by the State Inspector General pursuant to §

2.2-311

to investigate allegations of criminal behavior affecting the operations of a state or nonstate agency; (xi) employee with internal investigations authority designated by the Department of Corrections pursuant to subdivision 11 of §

53.1-10

or by the Department of Juvenile Justice pursuant to subdivision A 7 of §

66-3

; or (xii) private police officer employed by a private police department. Part-time employees are those compensated officers who are not full-time employees as defined by the employing police department, sheriff’s office, or private police department.

“Private police department”
means any police department, other than a department that employs police agents under the provisions of § 56-353, that employs private police officers operated by an entity authorized by statute or an act of assembly to establish a private police department or such entity’s successor in interest, provided it complies with the requirements set forth herein. No entity is authorized to operate a private police department or represent that it is a private police department unless such entity has been authorized by statute or an act of assembly or such entity is the successor in interest of an entity that has been authorized pursuant to this section, provided it complies with the requirements set forth herein. The authority of a private police department shall be limited to real property owned, leased, or controlled by the entity and, if approved by the local chief of police or sheriff, any contiguous property; such authority shall not supersede the authority, duties, or jurisdiction vested by law with the local police department or sheriff’s office including as provided in §§

15.2-1609

and

15.2-1704

. The chief of police or sheriff who is the chief local law-enforcement officer shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the private police department that addresses the duties and responsibilities of the private police department and the chief law-enforcement officer in the conduct of criminal investigations. Private police departments and private police officers shall be subject to and comply with the Constitution of the United States; the Constitution of Virginia; the laws governing municipal police departments, including the provisions of §§

9.1-600

,

15.2-1705

through

15.2-1708

,

15.2-1719

,

15.2-1721

,

15.2-1721

.1, and

15.2-1722

; and any regulations adopted by the Board that the Department designates as applicable to private police departments. Any person employed as a private police officer pursuant to this section shall meet all requirements, including the minimum compulsory training requirements, for law-enforcement officers pursuant to this chapter. A private police officer is not entitled to benefits under the Line of Duty Act (§

9.1-400

et seq.) or under the Virginia Retirement System, is not a “qualified law enforcement officer” or “qualified retired law enforcement officer” within the meaning of the federal Law Enforcement Officers Safety Act, 18 U.S.C. § 926B et seq., and shall not be deemed an employee of the Commonwealth or any locality. An authorized private police department may use the word “police” to describe its sworn officers and may join a regional criminal justice academy created pursuant to Article 5 (§

15.2-1747

et seq.) of Chapter 17 of Title 15.2. Any private police department in existence on January 1, 2013, that was not otherwise established by statute or an act of assembly and whose status as a private police department was recognized by the Department at that time is hereby validated and may continue to operate as a private police department as may such entity’s successor in interest, provided it complies with the requirements set forth herein.

“School resource officer”
means a certified law-enforcement officer hired by the local law-enforcement agency to provide law-enforcement and security services to Virginia public elementary and secondary schools.

“School security officer”
means an individual who is employed by the local school board or a private or religious school for the singular purpose of maintaining order and discipline, preventing crime, investigating violations of the policies of the school board or the private or religious school, and detaining students violating the law or the policies of the school board or the private or religious school on school property, school buses, or at school-sponsored events and who is responsible solely for ensuring the safety, security, and welfare of all students, faculty, staff, and visitors in the assigned school.

“Unapplied criminal history record information”
means information pertaining to criminal offenses submitted to the Central Criminal Records Exchange that cannot be applied to the criminal history record of an arrested or convicted person (i) because such information is not supported by fingerprints or other accepted means of positive identification or (ii) due to an inconsistency, error, or omission within the content of the submitted information.

History.

1981, c. 632, § 9-169; 1982, c. 419; 1983, c. 357; 1984, c. 543; 1989, c. 233; 1991, c. 338; 1992, cc. 422, 569; 1993, cc. 533, 622, 866; 2000, c. 426; 2001, c. 844; 2002, cc. 789, 836, 868; 2003, cc. 744, 934, 937; 2004, c. 30; 2005, c. 914; 2007, c. 87; 2008, c. 460; 2010, c. 621; 2012, c. 776; 2014, cc. 225, 342, 543; 2015, cc. 38, 195, 224, 730; 2016, cc. 498, 618; 2018, c. 548; 2019, cc. 120, 475, 782, 783; 2020, cc. 90, 958; 2020, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 37, 55.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until the amendments by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 524 and 542 take effect. For the version of this section effective as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 524 and 542, see the following section, also numbered §

9.1-101

.

Cross references.

As to duty of law-enforcement officers to enforce certain provisions, see § 3.2-1010 pertaining to endangered plant and insect species; see § 3.2-6013 pertaining to execution of orders of the State Veterinarian. As to animal control officers, see §§ 3.2-6555 and

15.2-631

. As to authority to serve capias or show cause order, see §

8.01-293

.

As to special conservators of the peace, see §

9.1-150.1

et seq., §

19.2-13

.

As to provisions establishing and developing crisis intervention teams, see Article 13 (§

9.1-187

) of Chapter 1 of Title 9.1.

As to law-enforcement civilian oversight bodies, see §

9.1-601

.

As to minimum qualifications of law-enforcement officers, see §

15.2-1705

.

As to penalty for bribery by law-enforcement officers in correctional facilities, see §

18.2-474.2

.

As to availability of court ordered psychiatric reports of criminal defendants, see §

19.2-301

.

As to accident report of law-enforcement officer involved in accident, see §

46.2-373.1

As to deeming of local social services department fraud prevention and investigation units to be criminal justice agencies as defined in §

9.1-101

, see §

63.2-526

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2008, c. 460, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $12,475 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts
2010, c. 621, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and is $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts
2015, cc. 38 and
730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts
2017, cc. 698 and
707, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts
2015, cc. 195 and
224, cl. 3 provides: “That, for the purposes of this act, the following private police departments were in existence on January 1, 2013 and were recognized as private police departments by the Department of Criminal Justice Services at that time: Aquia Harbour Police Department, the Babcock and Wilcox Police Department, the Bridgewater Airpark Police Department, the Carilion Police and Security Services Department, the Kings Dominion Park Police Department, the Kingsmill Police Department, the Lake Monticello Police Department, the Massanutten Police Department, and the Wintergreen Police Department.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Article 3 ( §

23.1-809

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 23.1” was substituted for “Chapter 17 ( § 23-232 et seq.) of Title 23” in the definition of “law-enforcement officer”
to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts
2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

Acts
2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 37, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts
2020 Sp. Sess. I, c. 55, cl. 2, effective March 1, 2021, provides: “That the Department of Criminal Justice Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 789 substituted “Virginia Marine Police” for “Virginia Marine Patrol” in clause (iii) of the definition of “Law-enforcement officer.”

The 2002 amendments by cc. 836 and 868 are identical, and added the definitions of “School resource officer” and “School security officer.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 744, in the first sentence of the paragraph defining “Law-enforcement officer,” deleted “or” at the end of clause (v), added “or” at the end of clause (vi), and added clause (vii).

The 2003 amendments by cc. 934 and 937 are identical, and inserted the last sentence in the first paragraph relating to “criminal justice agency.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 30, in the definition of “Law-enforcement officer,” deleted item (v), which read: “(v) agent, investigator, or inspector appointed under § 56-334”; and made a related change.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 914, effective April 6, 2005, added clause (iii) of the paragraph defining “Criminal justice agency” and made related changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 87 substituted “conservation police officer” for “game warden” in clause (iv) of the paragraph defining “Law-enforcement officer.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 460, in the definition of “Law-enforcement officer,” added clause (vii) and deleted the last sentence, which read: “Full-time sworn members of the enforcement division of the Department of Motor Vehicles meeting the Department of Criminal Justice Services qualifications shall be deemed to be ‘law-enforcement officers’ when fulfilling their duties pursuant to §

46.2-217

”; and made related changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 621 added clause (viii) and made a related change in the definition of “law-enforcement officer.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 776, inserted clause (ix) under “Law-enforcement officer” and made related changes and updated references.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 225, substituted “Virginia Lottery” for “State Lottery Department” in the definition of “Law-enforcement officer.”

The 2014 amendment by c. 342 inserted the third paragraph in the definition of “criminal justice agency.”

The 2014 amendment by c. 543 deleted “officers appointed under §

15.2-1737

, or” following “employs” and “or special policemen” following “of the peace” and “or special conservators” in the definition of “Criminal justice agency”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730, effective January 15, 2018, are identical and substituted “Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority” for “Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control” in subdivision (i) in the definition for “Law-enforcement officer.”

The 2015 amendments by cc. 195 and 224, effective March 16, 2015, are identical and, in the definition for “Law-enforcement officer,” inserted “or any full-time or part-time employee of a private police department,” added clause (x), added “or private police department” at the end and made related changes; and added the definition for “Private police department.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by c. 498, in the definition of “Law-enforcement officer,” inserted “or

15.2-836.1

.”

The 2016 amendment by c. 618, in the definition of “Private police department,” added “or operated by such entity’s successor in interest, provided it complies with the requirements set forth herein” at the end of the first sentence, added “or such entity is the successor in interest of an entity that has been authorized pursuant to this section, provided it complies with the requirements set forth herein” at the end of the second sentence, and inserted “as may such entity’s successor in interest” in the last sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 548 inserted clauses (x) and (xi) and made related changes in the definition of “Law-enforcement officer.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 120, in the definition of “School security officer,” inserted “or a private or religious school,” twice substituted “the policies of the school board or the private or religious school” for “school board policies” and inserted “school buses.”

The 2019 amendment by c. 475, in clause (v) of the definition for “Law-enforcement officer,” deleted “full-time” preceding “sworn member.”

The 2019 amendments by cc. 782 and 783 are identical, and added the definition for “Unapplied criminal history record information.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 90 inserted “‘Criminal justice agency’ includes the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission.”

The 2020 amendment by c. 958, substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” in the definition of “Law-enforcement officer,” clause (iv).

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 37 and 55, effective March 1, 2021, are identical, and inserted “15.2-1721.1” in the definition of “ ‘Private police department’ ”